Maine, session 132, LD910.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 24-A MRSA §4302, sub-§7 is enacted to read:
7. Claim and prior authorization denial reporting. Beginning in 2026, a carrier
shall provide a quarterly report to the superintendent that identifies the number of claims
for that quarter that were denied and the number of claims for that quarter for which prior
authorization was denied, regardless of whether the claim or the prior authorization was
approved at a later date. The quarterly report must also list the 5 most common reasons for
a claim denial and the 5 most common reasons for a prior authorization denial, in
decreasing order of occurrence.
By January 31st of each year, the superintendent shall submit a report on the information
collected under this subsection to the joint standing committee of the Legislature having
jurisdiction over health coverage, insurance and financial services matters. In addition to
the information provided by carriers under this subsection, the annual report must also
include information provided to the superintendent by the United States Department of
Health and Human Services regarding claim and prior authorization denials under the
federal Affordable Care Act. The committee is authorized to submit legislation related to
the annual report to the session of the Legislature in which the annual report is received.